Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,102.03
Developer; provide emergency training and equipment.

The developer shall provide to the appropriate local political subdivision training of the first responding fire, police, and emergency medical services to handle emergency events at the facility and support for affected county emergency management planning, training, and central dispatch facilities as may be required to handle emergency events at the facility. The developer shall conduct such training programs or contract with appropriate public or private agencies for such training. The content of any such training program shall, prior to the commencement of the training program, be approved by the appropriate state agency which is responsible for such emergency training activity. The developer shall also provide to the appropriate local political subdivision any equipment which is necessary to provide emergency response due to the location and operation of the facility.

Laws 1989, LB 761, § 17;

Laws 1997, LB 138, § 54.